California statutes. Financial Code
A license shall remain effective until the license is either suspended or revoked by the commissioner or surrendered by the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 28182.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry [28125. - 28125.2.]

28125.

(a) The commissioner is authorized to establish relationships or contracts with the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry or other entities designated by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry to collect and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons subject to this division.

(b) For the purpose of participating in the Nationwide
 Multistate Licensing System & Registry, the commissioner is authorized to waive or modify, in whole or in part, by rule, regulation, or order, any or all of the requirements of this division and to establish new requirements as reasonably necessary to participate in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry.

(c) The commissioner may use the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from, and distributing information to, the Department of Justice, any other governmental agency, or any other source, as directed by the commissioner.

(d) The commissioner shall establish a process through which applicants and licensees may challenge information entered into the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 379, Sec. 12.   (AB 38)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

28125.1.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 1512 of the SAFE Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 5111(a)), the requirements under any federal law or the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code) regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any information or material provided to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry, and any privilege arising under federal or state law, including the rules of any state
 court, with respect to that information or material, shall continue to apply to the information or material after the information or material has been disclosed to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry. The information and material may be shared with all state and federal regulatory officials with industry oversight authority without the loss of privilege or the loss of confidentiality protections provided by federal law or the Information Practices Act.

(b) Information or material that is subject to a privilege or confidentiality under subdivision (a) shall not be subject to the following:

(1) Disclosure under any federal or state law governing the disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or an agency of the federal government or the state.

(2) Subpoena or discovery, or
 admission into evidence, in any private civil action or administrative process, unless with respect to any privilege held by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry with respect to the information or material, the person to whom the information or material pertains waives, in whole or in part, in the discretion of that person, that privilege.

(c) This section shall not apply with respect to the information or material relating to the employment history of, and publicly adjudicated disciplinary and enforcement actions included in, the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry for access by the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 379, Sec. 12.   (AB 38)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

28125.2.

The commissioner shall report regularly violations of this division, as well as enforcement actions and other relevant information, to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry, to the extent that the information is a public record.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 379, Sec. 12.   (AB 38)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Licensee Duties [28126. - 28150.]

28126.

(a) A licensee shall notify the commissioner, in writing, of any change in the information provided in the application for a license, as applicable, not later than 10 business days after the occurrence of the event that results in the information becoming inaccurate or incomplete.

(b) (1) If a licensee seeks to change its
 place of business to a street address other than that designated in its license, the licensee shall provide notice to the commissioner at least 10 days prior to the change. The commissioner shall notify the licensee within 10 days if the commissioner disapproves the change, and if the commissioner does not notify the licensee of disapproval within 10 days, the change in address shall be deemed approved.

(2) If notice is not given at least 10 days prior to the change of a street address of a place of business, as required by subdivision (b), or notice is not given at least 10 days prior to engaging in the business of servicing student loans at a new location, the commissioner may assess a civil or administrative penalty on the licensee not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 28182.)
-------------------------------------------

28128.

(a) A licensee seeking to engage in the business of servicing student loans at a new location shall submit an application for a branch office license to the commissioner at least 10 days before engaging in the business of servicing student loans at a new location and pay the fee required by Section 28112.

(b) The licensee may engage in the business of servicing student loans at the new location 10 days after the date of submission of a branch office application.

(c) (1) The commissioner shall approve or deny the individual responsible for the servicing activity of the licensee at the new location in
 accordance with Article 2 of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 28112), and shall notify the licensee of this decision within 90 days of the date of receipt of the application.

(2) If the commissioner denies the application, the licensee shall, within 10 days of the date of receipt of notification of the commissioner’s denial, submit a new application to the commissioner designating a different individual responsible for the servicing activity of the licensee at the new location. The commissioner shall approve or deny the different individual as provided in paragraph (1).

(d) A licensee shall not engage in the business of servicing student loans at a new location in a name other than a name approved by the commissioner.

(e) A branch office license to engage in the business of servicing at a new location shall be issued in accordance with this section. A change of street address of a place of business designated in a license shall be made in accordance with Section 28126 and shall
 not constitute a new location subject to the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 379, Sec. 13.   (AB 38)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

28130.

A licensee shall do all of the following:

(a) Develop policies and procedures reasonably intended to promote compliance with this division.

(b) File with the commissioner any report required by the commissioner.

(c) Comply with the provisions of this division and any regulation or order of the commissioner.

(d) Submit to periodic examination by the commissioner as required by this division and any regulation or order of the commissioner.

(e) Advise the
 commissioner of filing a petition for bankruptcy within five days of the filing.

(f) Provide, free of charge on its internet website information or links to information regarding repayment and loan forgiveness options that may be available to borrowers and provide this information or these links to borrowers via written correspondence or email at least once per calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 154, Sec. 5.   (AB 376)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

28132.

(a) A licensee shall not be required to comply with the requirements of subdivision (g) of Section 28130, if the licensee reasonably determines that any of the following apply:

(1) A qualified written request is substantially the same as a qualified written request previously made by the borrower, for which the licensee has previously complied
 with its obligation to respond pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 28130, unless the borrower provides new and material information to support the more recent qualified written request. New and material information means information that was not reviewed by the licensee in connection with a prior qualified written request submitted by the same borrower and that is reasonably likely to change the licensee’s prior response related to that request.

(2) A qualified written request is overbroad. A qualified written request is overbroad if the licensee cannot reasonably determine from the qualified written request the specific error that the borrower asserts has occurred on his or her account or the specific information the borrower is requesting related to his or her account. To the extent a licensee can reasonably identify a valid assertion of an error or valid request for information in a qualified written request that is otherwise overbroad,
 the licensee shall comply with the requirements of subdivision (g) of Section 28130 with respect to that valid asserted error or request for information.

(3) A qualified written request is delivered to the licensee more than one year after the licensee sells, assigns, or transfers the servicing of the student loan that is the subject of the qualified written request to another servicer.

(b) If, pursuant to subdivision (a), a licensee determines that it is not required to comply with the requirements of subdivision (g) of Section 28130, the licensee shall notify the borrower of the determination, and the basis for its determination, in writing not later than five business days after making such determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 28182.)
-------------------------------------------

28138.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 28134 and unless prohibited by federal law, a licensee shall retain and maintain its records of servicing a borrower’s student loan for a minimum of three years after the student loan has been sold, assigned, transferred, or paid in full.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 28182.)
-------------------------------------------

28140.

(a) A licensee shall continuously maintain a minimum net worth of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(b) Subject to the commissioner’s sole discretion, an applicant or licensee that is a wholly owned subsidiary of a public holding company required to comply with the reporting requirements of the Securities and Exchange Commission may satisfy the requirement of subdivision (a) by submitting the annual consolidated audited financial statements filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including consolidating financial statements of the subsidiary, which evidence to the commissioner’s satisfaction that the subsidiary meets the continuous minimum net worth
 requirements of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 154, Sec. 8.   (AB 376)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

28142.

(a) A licensee shall maintain a surety bond in accordance with this section in a minimum amount of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). The bond shall be payable to the commissioner and issued by an insurer authorized to do business in this state. The surety bond, including any and all riders and endorsements executed subsequent to the effective date of the bond, shall be filed with the commissioner within 10 days of execution. For licensees with multiple licensed locations, only one surety bond is required. The bond shall be used for the recovery of expenses, fines, and fees levied by the commissioner in accordance with this division or for losses or damages incurred by borrowers as the result of a licensee’s noncompliance with the requirements
 of this division. The commissioner may require licensees to submit bonds, riders, and endorsements electronically through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry’s electronic surety bond function.

(b) When an action is commenced on a licensee’s bond, the commissioner may require the filing of a new bond. Immediately upon recovery of any action on the bond, the licensee shall file a new bond. Failure to file a new bond within 10 days of the recovery on a bond, or within 10 days after notification by the commissioner that a new bond is required, constitutes sufficient grounds for the suspension or revocation of the license.

(c) The commissioner may require a higher bond amount for a licensee based on the dollar amount of servicing of student loans by that
 licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 379, Sec. 17.   (AB 38)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

28144.

(a) Each licensee shall pay to the commissioner its pro rata share of all costs and expenses reasonably incurred in the administration of this division, as estimated by the commissioner, for the ensuing year and any deficit actually incurred or anticipated in the administration of the division in the year in which the assessment is made. The pro rata share shall be the proportion that a licensee’s servicing activities in this state bears to the costs and expenses remaining after the amount assessed pursuant to subdivision (c).

(b) On or before the 30th day of September in each year, the commissioner shall notify each licensee of the amount assessed and levied against it and
 that amount shall be paid by October 31. If payment is not made by October 31, the commissioner shall assess and collect a penalty, in addition to the assessment, of 1 percent of the assessment for each month or part of a month that the payment is delayed or withheld.

(c) In the levying and collection of the assessment, a licensee shall neither be assessed for nor be permitted to pay less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per licensed location per year.

(d) If a licensee fails to pay the assessment on or before the 31st day of October, the commissioner may by order summarily suspend or revoke the license issued to the licensee. If, after an order is made, a request for hearing is filed in writing within 30 days, and a hearing is not held within 60 days thereafter, the order is deemed rescinded
 as of its effective date. During any period when the license is revoked or suspended, a licensee shall not engage in the business of servicing student loans in this state pursuant to this division except as may be permitted by order of the commissioner. However, the revocation, suspension, or surrender of a license shall not affect the powers of the commissioner as provided in this division.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, the commissioner may by rule require licensees to pay assessments through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 379, Sec. 18.   (AB 38)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

28146.

(a) A licensee shall file an annual report with the commissioner, on or before the 15th day of March, giving the relevant information that the commissioner reasonably requires concerning the business and operations conducted by the licensee in the state during the preceding calendar year, including information regarding the number of loans that are sold, assigned, or transferred to another party. The
 individual annual reports filed pursuant to this section shall be made available to the public for inspection. The report shall be made under oath and in the form prescribed by the commissioner.

(b) A licensee shall make other special reports that may be required by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 28182.)
-------------------------------------------

28148.

(a) At the end of the licensee’s fiscal year, but in no case more than 12 months after the last audit conducted pursuant to this section, each licensee shall cause its books and accounts to be audited by an independent certified public accountant. The audit shall be sufficiently comprehensive in scope to permit the expression of an opinion on the financial statements prepared in accordance with generally
 accepted accounting principles and shall be performed in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards. The audit shall include a reconciliation of the licensee’s trust accounts as of the audit date.

(b) “Expression of an opinion” includes (1) an unqualified opinion, (2) a qualified opinion, (3) a disclaimer of opinion, or (4) an adverse opinion. If a financial statement, report, certificate, or opinion of the independent certified public accountant is in any way qualified, the commissioner may require the licensee to take any action that the commissioner deems appropriate to address the qualification. The commissioner may reject any financial statement, report, certificate, or opinion by notifying the licensee or other person required to make the filing of the rejection and the reason therefor. Within 30 days after the receipt of the notice, the licensee or other person shall correct the deficiencies. Failure to correct the
 deficiencies is a violation of this division. The commissioner shall retain a copy of all financial statements, reports, certificates, or opinions so rejected.

(c) If a qualified or adverse opinion is expressed or if an opinion is disclaimed, the reasons therefor shall be fully explained.

(d) The audit report shall be filed with the commissioner within 105 days of the end of the licensee’s fiscal year. The report filed with the commissioner shall be certified by the certified public accountant conducting the audit.

(e) If a licensee required to make an audit fails to cause an audit to be made, the commissioner may cause the audit to be made by an independent certified public accountant at the licensee’s expense. The commissioner shall select the independent certified public accountant by advertising for bids or by
 other fair and impartial means. The commissioner may summarily revoke the license of a licensee who fails to file a certified financial statement prepared by an independent certified public accountant as required by this division or at the request of the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 28182.)
-------------------------------------------

28150.

A licensee that ceases to service student loans to borrowers shall inform the commissioner in writing and surrender the license and all other indicia of license to the commissioner. The commissioner may require a licensee to file a plan for the disposition of the servicing business that includes, but is not limited to, a closing audit. Upon receipt of the written notice and plan, if required, the commissioner shall determine
 whether the licensee has violated this division. The commissioner shall give a licensee notice of accepting a surrendered license, and a license shall not be deemed surrendered until the commissioner accepts its tender in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 28182.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Administration and Power of the Commissioner [28152. - 28153.5.]

28152.

(a) As often as the commissioner deems necessary and appropriate, but at least once every 36 months, the commissioner shall examine the affairs of each licensee for compliance with this division. The commissioner shall appoint suitable persons to perform the examination. The commissioner and his or her appointees may examine the books, records, and documents of the licensee, and may examine the licensee’s officers, directors, employees, or agents under oath regarding the licensee’s operations. The commissioner may cooperate with any agency of the state, the
 federal government, or other states.

(b) Unless otherwise exempt pursuant to Section 28102, affiliates of a licensee are subject to examination by the commissioner on the same terms as the licensee, but only when reports from, or examination of, a licensee provides documented evidence of unlawful activity between a licensee and affiliate benefitting, affecting, or arising from the activities regulated by this division.

(c) The cost of each examination of a licensee shall be paid to the commissioner by the licensee examined, and the commissioner may maintain an action for the recovery of the cost in any court of competent jurisdiction. In determining the cost of the examination, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost for all persons performing examinations of licensees or other persons subject to this division for the fiscal year.

(d) The statement of the findings of an examination shall belong to the
 commissioner and shall not be disclosed to anyone other than the licensee, law enforcement officials, or other state or federal regulatory agencies for further investigation and enforcement. Reports required of licensees by the commissioner under this division and results of examinations performed by the commissioner under this division are the property of the commissioner.

(e) The commissioner shall provide a written statement of the findings of the examination, issue a copy of that statement to the licensee and take appropriate steps to ensure correction of any violations of this division.

(f) Notwithstanding any provision of this division, the commissioner shall have the authority to waive one or more branch office examinations, if the commissioner deems that the branch office examinations are not necessary for the protection of the public, due to the centralized operations of the licensee or other factors acceptable to the
 commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 28182.)
-------------------------------------------

28153.

The commissioner may require persons who are not expressly excluded from this division under subdivision (b) of Section 28102 to file with the commissioner, under oath or otherwise, in the form and within a reasonable period of time as prescribed by the commissioner by special reports, or answers in writing to specific questions or requests for information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 379, Sec. 19.   (AB 38)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

28153.5.

In any proceeding under this division, the burden of proving an exemption or an exception from a definition is upon the person claiming it.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 379, Sec. 20.   (AB 38)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Enforcement [28154. - 28176.]

28154.

(a) If a licensee fails to do either of the following, the commissioner shall impose a penalty in a sum of up to one hundred dollars ($100) for every day late:

(1) To make any report required by law or by the commissioner within 10 days from the day designated for the making of the report, or within any extension of time granted by the commissioner.

(2) To include therein any matter required by law or by the commissioner.

(b) The commissioner may by order summarily suspend or revoke the license if a licensee fails to file any report required by this
 division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 379, Sec. 21.   (AB 38)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

28156.

(a) The commissioner may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing, by order, censure or suspend for a period not exceeding 12 months, or bar from any position of employment, management, or control of any licensee, or any other person, if the commissioner finds either of the following:

(1) That the censure, suspension, or bar is in
 the public interest and that the person has committed or caused a violation of this division or rule or order of the commissioner, which violation was either known or should have been known by the person committing or causing it or has caused material damage to the licensee or to the public.

(2) That the person has been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to any crime, or has been held liable in any civil action by final judgment, or any administrative judgment by any public agency, if that crime or civil or administrative judgment involved any offense specified in subdivision (b) of Section 50317, or any other offense reasonably related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in the business in accordance with the provisions of this division.

(b) Within 15 days from the date of a notice of intention to issue an order pursuant to subdivision (a), the
 person may request a hearing under the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Upon receipt of a request, the matter shall be set for hearing to commence within 30 days after such receipt unless the person subject to this division consents to a later date. If no hearing is requested within 15 days after the mailing or service of such notice and none is ordered by the commissioner, the failure to request a hearing shall constitute a waiver of the right to a hearing.

(c) Upon receipt of a notice of intention to issue an order pursuant to this section, the person who is the subject of the proposed order is immediately prohibited from engaging in any servicing.

(d) Persons suspended or barred under this section are prohibited from participating in any business activity of a licensee and from engaging in
 any business activity on the premises where a licensee is servicing.

(e) This section shall apply to any violation, conviction, plea, or judgment occurring at any time prior to and after the enactment of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 28182.)
-------------------------------------------

28158.

If, after investigation, the commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe that a licensee is conducting or has conducted business in an unsafe or injurious manner, the commissioner shall, by written order addressed to the licensee, direct the discontinuance of the unsafe or injurious practices. The order shall be effective immediately, but shall not become final except in accordance with the provisions of Section 28164.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 188, Sec. 16.   (AB 2433)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

28160.

Whenever, in the opinion of the commissioner, a person is engaged in the business of servicing student loans in this state, either actually or through subterfuge, without a license from the commissioner, the commissioner may order that person to desist and refrain. If, within 30 days after an order is served, a request for a hearing is filed in writing and the hearing is not held within 60 days of the filing, the order is
 rescinded. This section does not apply to persons exempted under subdivision (b) of Section 28102.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 28182.)
-------------------------------------------

28162.

If, after investigation, the commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe that a licensee is failing to comply with this division or any regulation or order of the commissioner, the commissioner shall, by written order addressed to the licensee, direct the discontinuance of the failure to comply. The order shall be effective immediately, but shall not become final except in accordance with the provisions of Section
 28164.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 28182.)
-------------------------------------------

28164.

(a) No order issued pursuant to this chapter may become final except after notice to the affected licensee of the commissioner’s intention to make the order final and of the reasons for the finding. The commissioner shall also notify the licensee that upon receiving a request, the matter will be set for hearing to commence within 15 business days after receipt. The licensee may consent to have the hearing commence at a later date. If no hearing is requested within 30 days after the mailing or service of the required notice, and none is ordered by the commissioner, the order may become final without hearing and the licensee shall immediately discontinue the practices named in the order. If a hearing is requested or ordered, it shall be held in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5
 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and the commissioner shall have all of the powers granted under that act. If, upon the hearing, it appears to the commissioner that the licensee is conducting business in an unsafe and injurious manner or is failing or has failed to comply with this division or any regulation or order of the commissioner, the commissioner shall make the order of discontinuance final and the licensee shall immediately discontinue the practices named in the order.

(b) The licensee has 10 days after an order is made final to commence an action to restrain enforcement of the order. If the enforcement of the order is not enjoined within 10 days by the court in which the action is brought, the licensee shall comply with the order.

(c) The commissioner may immediately revoke the licensee’s license if the licensee
 fails to comply with any order issued under this division. The commissioner shall not revoke the license if, within 10 days from the effective date of the revocation order, the licensee secures a court order restraining the enforcement of the commissioner’s revocation order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 188, Sec. 17.   (AB 2433)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

28166.

The commissioner may issue an order suspending or revoking a license if, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, the commissioner finds any of the following:

(a) The licensee is violating this division or a regulation adopted or an order issued under this division.

(b) The licensee does not
 cooperate with an examination or investigation by the commissioner.

(c) The licensee engages in fraud, intentional misrepresentation, or gross negligence in servicing a student loan.

(d) The competence, experience, character, or general fitness of the licensee, an individual specified in Section 28116, or any person responsible for servicing a student loan for the licensee indicates that it is not in the public interest to permit the licensee to continue servicing student loans.

(e) The licensee engages in unsafe or injurious practice.

(f) The licensee is insolvent, suspends payment of its obligations, or makes a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors.

(g) Any fact or
 condition exists that, if it had existed at the time the licensee applied for the license, would have been grounds for denying the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 28182.)
-------------------------------------------

28168.

(a) If, after investigation, the commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe that a person has engaged or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this division or any rule or order hereunder, the commissioner may bring an action to enjoin the acts or practices or to enforce compliance with this division or any rule or order adopted under this division. The action shall be brought in the name of the people of the State of California in the superior court. Upon a proper showing, a permanent or preliminary
 injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandate shall be granted. A receiver, monitor, conservator, or other designated fiduciary or officer of the court, which may include the commissioner, may be appointed for the defendant or the defendant’s assets. Any other ancillary relief may be granted as appropriate.

A receiver, monitor, conservator, or other designated fiduciary or officer of the court appointed by the superior court pursuant to this section may, with the approval of the court, exercise any or all of the powers of the defendant’s officers, directors, partners, trustees, or persons who exercise similar powers and perform similar duties. The powers include the filing of a petition for bankruptcy. No action at law or in equity may be maintained by any party against the commissioner, or a receiver, monitor, conservator, or other designated fiduciary or officer of the court, by reason of their exercising these powers or performing these duties pursuant to the order of, or with the approval of,
 the superior court.

(b) If the commissioner determines it is in the public interest, the commissioner may include in any action authorized by subdivision (a) a claim for ancillary relief. The ancillary relief may include, but not be limited to, restitution or disgorgement or damages on behalf of the persons injured by the act or practice constituting the subject matter of the action. The court shall have jurisdiction to award additional relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 28182.)
-------------------------------------------

28170.

(a) If, upon inspection, examination or investigation, based upon a complaint or otherwise, the department has cause to believe that a person is engaged in the business of servicing student loans without a license, or a licensee or person is violating any provision of this division or any rule or order thereunder, the department may issue a citation to that person in writing, describing with particularity the basis of the citation. Each citation may contain an order to desist and refrain and an assessment of an administrative penalty not to exceed two thousand
 five hundred dollars ($2,500). All penalties collected under this section shall be deposited in the State Corporations Fund.

(b) The sanctions authorized under this section shall be separate from, and in addition to, all other administrative, civil, or criminal remedies.

(c) If within 30 days from the receipt of the citation the person cited fails to notify the department that the person intends to request a hearing as described in subdivision (d), the citation shall be deemed final.

(d) Any hearing under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and in all states the commissioner has all the powers granted therein.

(e) After the exhaustion of the review procedures provided for in this section, the department may apply to the appropriate superior court for a judgment in the amount of the
 administrative penalty and order compelling the cited person to comply with the order of the department. The application, which shall include a certified copy of the final order of the department, shall constitute a sufficient showing to warrant the issuance of the judgment and order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 28182.)
-------------------------------------------

28172.

(a) Any person who violates a provision of this division, or any rule or order under this division, shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation. This penalty shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the commissioner in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) As applied to the penalties for acts in violation of this division, the remedies provided by this section and by other sections of this
 division are not exclusive, and may be sought and employed in any combination to enforce the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 28182.)
-------------------------------------------

28174.

(a) The commissioner may refer the evidence that is available concerning any violation of this division or of any rule or order adopted under this division to the district attorney of the county in which the violation occurred. The district attorney may, with or without the commissioner’s referral, institute criminal proceedings under this division. The commissioner and his or her counsel, deputies, or assistants may, upon request of the district attorney, assist the district attorney in presenting the law or facts at the trial.

(b) After an examination, investigation, or hearing under this division, if the commissioner deems it of public interest or advantage, he or she may certify a record to the proper prosecuting official of the county or city in which the act complained of, examined, or investigated occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 28182.)
-------------------------------------------

28176.

All hearings provided for in this division shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The commissioner has all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 28182.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Miscellaneous [28178. - 28182.]

28178.

If any provision of this division or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, illegal, or unenforceable, such invalidity, illegality, or unenforceability shall not affect other provisions or applications of this division that can be given effect without the invalid, illegal, or unenforceable provision or application, and, to this end, the provisions of this division are declared to be
 severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 28182.)
-------------------------------------------

28180.

The rights and remedies provided in this division are in addition to any other rights and remedies provided by law.
